Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2802
Property; unpaid taxes; governing body; certify to county treasurer; certify value of property less than total taxes.

The governing body of the political subdivision owning property described in section 77-2801 and desiring to sell the same shall certify by official action to the county treasurer of the county in which the property is located, the legal description of the property and the street address of such property if within a city or village, that the value of the property is less than the total of all taxes, special assessments and interest, penalties, and cost levied against such property, and that the owner desires that such property be sold.

Laws 1967, c. 483, § 2, p. 1495.